Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board

§ 45-11-251.
Board established; members; terms; qualifications; officers.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board. The board shall consist of eleven (11) members. The Commissioner of Insurance and the Director of the State Fire Academy shall serve as ex officio members. The Director of the State Fire Academy shall serve as secretary to the board. The Commissioner of Insurance may appoint a designee to serve in his absence.

Nine (9) members of the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board shall be selected as follows:

Two (2) full-time paid firefighters below the rank of chief selected by the Mississippi Fire Fighters Association. The initial term shall be staggered with one (1) member serving a two-year term and one (1) member serving a three-year term. After the expiration of the initial term, the term shall be for three (3) years;

One (1) full-time firefighter below the rank of fire chief selected by the Professional Fire Fighters Association of Mississippi;

Three (3) career fire chiefs selected by the Mississippi Fire Chiefs Association. The initial term shall be staggered: one (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year; one (1) member shall serve a term of two (2) years; and one (1) member shall serve a term of three (3) years. After the expiration of the initial term, the term shall be for three (3) years;

One (1) full-time paid certified fire instructor selected by the Mississippi Fire Fighters Service Instructors Association. The initial term shall be for one (1) year. After the expiration of the initial term, the term shall be for three (3) years;

One (1) full-time paid fire investigator from a paid department selected by the Mississippi Fire Investigators Association. The initial term shall be for two (2) years. After the expiration of the initial term, the term shall be for three (3) years; and

One (1) member of the volunteer fire service selected by the Mississippi Fire Fighters Association. The initial term shall be for three (3) years. After the expiration of the initial term, the term shall be for three (3) years.

No member selected under this subsection shall serve more than two (2) terms consecutively. Any member missing three (3) consecutive meetings shall be deemed to have resigned from the board. A vacancy prior to the expiration of a term shall be filled by selection in the same manner and for the balance of the unexpired term.

During his term, a member of the board shall not serve as a member of the State Fire Academy Advisory Board.

The board shall select a chairman and vice chairman from its membership.

The Department of Insurance shall provide administrative support for the board.

Members of the Mississippi Fire Personnel Minimum Standards and Certification Board who are not state employees shall be entitled to a per diem compensation as provided in Section 25-3-69, and to travel expenses as provided in Section 25-3-41. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to travel necessary to attend board meetings, as well as other travel authorized by the board and required in the performance of official duties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 533, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 312, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 45-11-253.
Functions, powers, and duties of Board.

The board shall:

Establish minimum educational and training standards for fire personnel.

Certify persons as being qualified under Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253 to be fire personnel.

Revoke certifications for cause and in the manner provided in Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253.

Establish minimum curriculum requirements for basic and advanced courses and programs for schools operated by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training fire personnel.

Make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview.

Make such inspection and evaluation as may be necessary to determine if governmental units are complying with Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253 at cost to those units.

Approve fire training schools for operation by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training personnel.

Upon the request of agencies, conduct surveys or aid municipalities and counties to conduct surveys at cost to those agencies through qualified public or private agencies and assist in the implementation of any recommendations resulting from such surveys.

Upon request of training agencies, conduct general and specific management surveys and studies of the operations of the requesting agencies at cost to those agencies. The role of the board under this subsection shall be that of consultant.

Adopt and amend regulations consistent with law, for its internal management and control of board programs.

Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253.

Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of Sections 45-11-251 and 45-11-253, including the authority to require the submission of reports and information by fire service agencies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 529, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.